Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 4. Death Certificates and Out-of-State Transit Permits.

§ 32.1-263.
Filing death certificates; medical certification; investigation by Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

A death certificate, including, if known, the social security number or control number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342 of the deceased, shall be filed for each death that occurs in the Commonwealth. Non-electronically filed death certificates shall be filed with the registrar of any district in the Commonwealth within three days after such death and prior to final disposition or removal of the body from the Commonwealth. Electronically filed death certificates shall be filed with the State Registrar of Vital Records through the Electronic Death Registration System within three days after such death and prior to final disposition or removal of the body from the Commonwealth. Any death certificate shall be registered by such registrar if it has been completed and filed in accordance with the following requirements:

If the place of death is unknown, but the dead body is found in the Commonwealth, the death shall be registered in the Commonwealth and the place where the dead body is found shall be shown as the place of death. If the date of death is unknown, it shall be determined by approximation, taking into consideration all relevant information, including information provided by the immediate family regarding the date and time that the deceased was last seen alive, if the individual died in his home; and

When death occurs in a moving conveyance, in the United States of America and the body is first removed from the conveyance in the Commonwealth, the death shall be registered in the Commonwealth and the place where it is first removed shall be considered the place of death. When a death occurs on a moving conveyance while in international waters or air space or in a foreign country or its air space and the body is first removed from the conveyance in the Commonwealth, the death shall be registered in the Commonwealth but the certificate shall show the actual place of death insofar as can be determined.

The licensed funeral director, funeral service licensee, office of the state anatomical program, or next of kin as defined in § 54.1-2800 who first assumes custody of a dead body shall complete the certificate of death. He shall obtain personal data of the deceased necessary to complete the certificate of death, including the social security number of the deceased or control number issued to the deceased by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342, from the best qualified person or source available and obtain the medical certification from the person responsible therefor.

If a licensed funeral director, funeral service licensee, or representative of the office of the state anatomical program completes the certificate of death, he shall file the certificate of death with the State Registrar of Vital Records electronically using the Electronic Death Registration System and in accordance with the requirements of subsection A. If a member of the next of kin of the deceased completes the certificate of death, he shall file the certificate of death in accordance with the requirements of subsection A but shall not be required to file the certificate of death electronically.

The medical certification shall be completed and filed electronically with the State Registrar of Vital Records using the Electronic Death Registration System within 24 hours after death by the physician or autonomous nurse practitioner in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition that resulted in death except when inquiry or investigation by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is required by §

32.1-283

or

32.1-285.1

, or by the physician or autonomous nurse practitioner who pronounces death pursuant to § 54.1-2972. If the death occurred while under the care of a hospice provider, the medical certification shall be completed by the decedent’s health care provider and filed electronically with the State Registrar of Vital Records using the Electronic Death Registration System for completion of the death certificate.

In the absence of such physician or autonomous nurse practitioner or with his approval, the certificate may be completed and filed by the following: (i) another physician or autonomous nurse practitioner employed or engaged by the same professional practice; (ii) a physician assistant supervised by such physician; (iii) a nurse practitioner who is not an autonomous nurse practitioner practicing in accordance with the provisions of § 54.1-2957; (iv) the chief medical officer or medical director, or his designee, of the institution, hospice, or nursing home in which death occurred; (v) a physician or autonomous nurse practitioner specializing in the delivery of health care to hospitalized or emergency department patients who is employed by or engaged by the facility where the death occurred; (vi) the physician who performed an autopsy upon the decedent; (vii) an individual to whom the physician or autonomous nurse practitioner has delegated authority to complete and file the certificate, if such individual has access to the medical history of the case and death is due to natural causes; or (viii) a physician who is not licensed by the Board of Medicine who was in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition that resulted in death. A physician described in clause (viii) who completes a certificate in accordance with this subsection shall not be required to register with the Electronic Death Registration System or complete the certificate electronically.

As used in this subsection, “autonomous nurse practitioner” has the same meaning as provided in § 54.1-2972.

When inquiry or investigation by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is required by §

32.1-283

or

32.1-285.1

, the Chief Medical Examiner shall cause an investigation of the cause of death to be made and the medical certification portion of the death certificate to be completed and filed within 24 hours after being notified of the death. If the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner refuses jurisdiction, the physician last furnishing medical care to the deceased shall prepare and file the medical certification portion of the death certificate.

If the death is a natural death and a death certificate is being prepared pursuant to § 54.1-2972 and the physician, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant is uncertain about the cause of death, he shall use his best medical judgment to certify a reasonable cause of death or contact the health district physician director in the district where the death occurred to obtain guidance in reaching a determination as to a cause of death and document the same.

If the cause of death cannot be determined within 24 hours after death, the medical certification shall be completed as provided by regulations of the Board. The attending physician or autonomous nurse practitioner, as defined in § 54.1-2972, or the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

shall give the funeral director or person acting as such notice of the reason for the delay, and final disposition of the body shall not be made until authorized by the attending physician, autonomous nurse practitioner, the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a medical examiner appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

.

A physician, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or individual delegated authority to complete and file a certificate of death by a physician who, in good faith, files a certificate of death or determines the cause of death shall be immune from civil liability, only for such filing and determination of causes of death on such certificate, absent gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.20; 1960, c. 451; 1978, c. 308; 1979, c. 711; 1983, c. 240; 1993, c. 965; 1997, cc. 794, 898; 2003, c. 484; 2004, c. 124; 2008, c. 137; 2011, c. 613; 2012, c. 213; 2013, c. 799; 2014, c. 583; 2017, c. 784; 2018, cc. 207, 208, 776; 2019, cc. 213, 224; 2022, c. 184.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 213 and 224, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2020.”

Acts 2019, cc. 213 and 224, cl. 3 provides: “That every licensed physician of medicine or osteopathy, physician assistant, and nurse practitioner who practices (i) as a hospitalist or in the specialty of emergency medicine in a hospital or as a medical director at a nursing home located in the Commonwealth shall register with the Electronic Death Registration System and shall file each medical certification of death completed in accordance with the requirements of §

32.1-263

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, electronically with the Electronic Death Registration System beginning July 1, 2019; (ii) in the specialty of family medicine or internal medicine shall register with the Electronic Death Registration System and shall file each medical certification of death completed in accordance with the requirements of §

32.1-263

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, electronically with the Electronic Death Registration System beginning October 1, 2019; (iii) in the specialty of oncology or general surgery shall register with the Electronic Death Registration System and shall file each medical certification of death completed in accordance with the requirements of § 32.1-263 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, electronically with the Electronic Death Registration System beginning November 1, 2019; and (iv) in any other specialty and completes medical certifications of death pursuant to § 32.1-263 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall register with the Electronic Death Registration System and shall file each medical certification of death completed in accordance with the requirements of § 32.1-263 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, electronically with the Electronic Death Registration System beginning December 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, cc. 213 and 224, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Health shall work with the Medical Society of Virginia, Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, Virginia Funeral Directors Association, Virginia Morticians’ Association, Inc., Association of Independent Funeral Homes of Virginia, and other stakeholders to educate and encourage physicians, physician assistants, and nurse practitioners to timely register with and utilize the Electronic Death Registration System.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 484 substituted “24” for “twenty-four” throughout the section; and added “taking into consideration all relevant information, including but not limited to, information provided by the immediate family regarding the date and time that the deceased was last seen alive, if the individual died in his home” at the end of subdivision A 1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 124, in subsection B, inserted “licensed” preceding “funeral director” and substituted “funeral service licensee, office of the state anatomical program, or next of kin as defined in § 54.1-2800” for “or person” in the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 137, in subsection C, inserted “in black or dark blue ink,” and added “or by the physician that pronounces death pursuant to § 54.1-2972” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 613, in the last paragraph in subsection C, substituted “absence of such physician” for “absence of the physician” and “signed by another physician employed or engaged by the same professional practice” for “signed by an associate physician,” and inserted “a nurse practitioner or physician assistant supervised by such physician” and “a physician specializing in the delivery of health care to hospitalized or emergency department patients who is employed by or engaged by the facility where the death occurred”; added the first paragraph in subsection E; and added subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 213, in subsection C, in the last paragraph, deleted “nurse practitioner or” preceding “physician assistant” and inserted “a nurse practitioner practicing as part of a patient care team as defined in § 54.1-2900 with such physician” preceding “the chief medical officer.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 799, in subsection C, in the second paragraph, added the clause (i) through (vi) designators and added clause (vii), and inserted “the following” at the end of the introductory clause, deleted “with such physician” at the end of clause (iii), inserted “or medical director, or his designee” and “hospice, or nursing home” in clause (iv), and made punctuation changes and a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsections C and D, substituted “the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “a medical examiner”; in subsection D, substituted “Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner,” “cause an investigation of” for “investigate,” inserted “to be made” and “to be completed and signed,” and deleted “shall complete and sign” preceding “the medical certification”; and in the second paragraph of subsection E, inserted “the Chief Medical Examiner, an Assistant Chief Medical Examiner, or a” twice and “appointed pursuant to §

32.1-282

” twice; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 784, in subsection A, rewrote the introductory paragraph which formerly read: “A death certificate, including, if known, the social security number or control number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342 of the deceased, shall be filed for each death which occurs in this Commonwealth with the registrar of the district in which the death occurred within three days after such death and prior to final disposition or removal of the body from the Commonwealth, and shall be registered by such registrar if it has been completed and filed in accordance with the following requirements”; in subdivision A 1, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” and “the death shall be registered in the Commonwealth and the” for “a death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the dead body is found in accordance with this section. The”; and in subdivision A 2, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 207 and 208 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “through the Electronic Death Registration System”; in subsection B, substituted “complete the certificate of death” for “file the certificate of death with the registrar” in the first sentence and substituted “personal data of the deceased necessary to complete the certificate of death” for “the personal data” and “best qualified person” for “next of kin or the best qualified person” in the second sentence of the first paragraph, and added the second paragraph; in subsection C, added the second sentence in the first paragraph and added clause (viii) in the second paragraph; in subsection F, inserted “files or” preceding “signs.”

The 2018 amendment by c. 776, in the second paragraph of subsection C, substituted “in accordance with the provisions of § 54.1-2957” for “as part of a patient care team as defined in § 54.1-2900” in clause (iii).

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 213 and 224 are identical, effective January 1, 2020, and in subsections C, D, and F, substituted “filed” for “signed” or similar language; in the first paragraph of subsection C, substituted “and filed electronically with the State Registrar of Vital Records using the Electronic Death Registration System” for “signed in black or dark blue ink, and returned to the funeral director,” in the second paragraph of subsection C, substituted “physician who is not licensed by the Board of Medicine” for “physician licensed in another state” and added the last sentence; and in subsection F, inserted “or individual delegated authority to complete and file a certificate of death by a physician” and substituted “filing” for “signature”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 184 in subsection C, inserted “or autonomous nurse practitioner” or “who is not an autonomous nurse practitioner” throughout except as noted elsewhere in this note; substituted “by the physician or autonomous nurse practitioner who pronounces death” for “by the physician that pronounces death” in subsection C in the first paragraph; added the last paragraph in subsection C; in subsection E in the second paragraph, inserted “or autonomous nurse practitioner, as defined in § 54.1-2972” near the first part of the second sentence and “autonomous nurse practitioner” near the last part of the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-264.
Reports of fetal deaths; medical certification; investigation by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner; confidentiality of information concerning abortions.

A fetal death report for each fetal death which occurs in this Commonwealth shall be filed, on a form furnished by the State Registrar, with the registrar of the district in which the delivery occurred or the abortion was performed within three days after such delivery or abortion and shall be registered with such registrar if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this section, provided that:

If the place of fetal death is unknown, a fetal death report shall be filed in the registration district in which a dead fetus was found within three days after discovery of such fetus; and

If a fetal death occurs in a moving conveyance, a fetal death report shall be filed in the registration district in which the fetus was first removed from such conveyance.

The funeral director or person who first assumes custody of a dead fetus or, in the absence of a funeral director or such person, the hospital representative who first assumes custody of a fetus shall file the fetal death report; in the absence of such a person, the physician or other person in attendance at or after the delivery or abortion shall file the report of fetal death. The person completing the forms shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available, and he shall obtain the medical certification of cause of death from the person responsible for preparing the same as provided in this section. In the case of induced abortion, such forms shall not identify the patient by name.

The medical certification portion of the fetal death report shall be completed and signed within 24 hours after delivery or abortion by the physician in attendance at or after delivery or abortion except when inquiry or investigation by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is required.

When a fetal death occurs without medical attendance upon the mother at or after the delivery or abortion or when inquiry or investigation by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is required, the Chief Medical Examiner shall cause an investigation of the cause of fetal death to be made and the medical certification portion of the fetal death report to be completed and signed within 24 hours after being notified of a fetal death.

The reports required pursuant to this section are statistical reports to be used only for medical and health purposes and shall not be incorporated into the permanent official records of the system of vital records. A schedule for the disposition of these reports may be provided by regulation.

The physician or facility attending an individual who has delivered a dead fetus shall maintain a copy of the fetal death report for one year and, upon written request by the individual and payment of an appropriate fee, shall furnish the individual a copy of such report.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.21; 1960, c. 451; 1975, c. 267; 1979, c. 711; 1983, c. 240; 1987, c. 405; 2014, c. 583.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 583, in subsections C and D, substituted “the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner” for “a medical examiner”; and in subsection D, substituted “Chief Medical Examiner” for “medical examiner,” “cause an investigation of” for “investigate,” and “to be made and” for “and shall complete and sign” and inserted “to be completed and signed”; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-265.
Transit permits; permits for disinterment and reinterment.

The funeral director or other person who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus shall obtain an out-of-state transit permit prior to removal from the Commonwealth of the body or fetus.

Such out-of-state transit permit shall be issued by the registrar of the district where a satisfactorily completed certificate of death or fetal death was filed.

A transit permit issued under the law of another state which accompanies a dead body or fetus brought into this Commonwealth shall be authority for final disposition of the body or fetus in this Commonwealth.

No permit shall be required where disposal of dead bodies or fetuses for deaths or fetal deaths which have occurred in this Commonwealth is to be made in this Commonwealth.

A permit for disinterment and reinterment shall be required prior to disinterment of a dead body or fetus except as authorized by regulation of the Board or otherwise provided by law. Such permit shall be issued by the State Registrar or the registrar of the county or city where the body or fetus is interred to a licensed funeral director.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.22; 1960, c. 451; 1970, c. 699; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-266.
Extending time for filing death certificates and obtaining out-of-state transit permits.

The Board may provide by regulation for the extension, upon conditions designed to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter, of the periods prescribed in §§

32.1-263

,

32.1-264

and

32.1-265

for the filing of death certificates, fetal death reports and medical certifications of cause of death and for the obtaining of out-of-state transit permits in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-353.23; 1960, c. 451; 1979, c. 711.